Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2546
Reversal of judgment of conviction; delivery of convicted person to custody of sheriff; await further judgment and order of court.

Whenever the Supreme Court reverses the judgment of conviction in accordance with which any convicted person has been sentenced to death and is confined in a Department of Correctional Services adult correctional facility as herein provided, it shall be the duty of the Director of Correctional Services, upon receipt of a copy of such judgment of reversal, duly certified by the clerk of the court and under the seal thereof, to forthwith deliver such convicted person into the custody of the sheriff of the county in which the conviction was had to be held in the jail of the county awaiting the further judgment and order of the court in the case.

Laws 1973, LB 268, § 31;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 13;

Laws 2009, LB36, § 8;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 35;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The repeal of section 29-2546 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 35, is not effective because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.